Missouri, session 2026, HB2188.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 191 and 565, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto twenty-
seven new sections, to be known as sections 191.2400, 191.2405, 191.2410, 191.2415,
191.2420, 191.2425, 191.2430, 191.2435, 191.2440, 191.2445, 191.2450, 191.2455,
191.2460, 191.2465, 191.2470, 191.2475, 191.2480, 191.2485, 191.2490, 191.2495,
191.2496, 191.2500, 191.2505, 191.2510, 191.2515, 191.2520, and 565.017, to read as
follows:
191.2400. Sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Marilyn Teitelbaum Death with Dignity Act".
191.2405. As used in sections 191.2400 to 191.2520, unless the context otherwise
indicates, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adult", a person who is eighteen years of age or older;
(2) "Attending physician", the physician who has primary responsibility for the
care of a patient and the treatment of that patient's terminal disease;
(3) "Competent", in the opinion of a court or in the opinion of the patient's
attending physician or consulting physician, psychiatrist, or psychologist, a patient has
the ability to make and communicate an informed decision to health care providers,
including communication through persons familiar with the patient's manner of
communicating if those persons are available;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2188 2
(4) "Consulting physician", a physician who is qualified by specialty or
experience to make a professional diagnosis and prognosis regarding a patient's disease;
(5) "Counseling", one or more consultations between a state-licensed
psychiatrist, state-licensed psychologist, state-licensed clinical social worker, or state-
licensed clinical professional counselor and a patient for the purpose of determining that
the patient is competent and not suffering from a psychiatric or psychological disorder
or depression that so impairs judgment as to prevent the patient's informed decision;
(6) "Health care provider", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350 and includes any person licensed, certified, or otherwise permitted by law to
dispense medication in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession;
(7) "Informed decision", a decision by a qualified patient to request and obtain a
prescription for medication that the qualified patient may self-administer to end the
qualified patient's life in a humane and dignified manner that is based on an
appreciation of the relevant facts and that is made after being fully informed by the
attending physician of:
(a) The qualified patient's medical diagnosis;
(b) The qualified patient's prognosis;
(c) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to be prescribed;
(d) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; and
(e) The feasible alternatives to taking the medication to be prescribed, including
palliative care and comfort care, hospice care, pain control, and disease-directed
treatment options;
(8) "Medically confirmed", the medical opinion of an attending physician has
been confirmed by a consulting physician who has examined the patient and the
patient's relevant medical records;
(9) "Patient", an adult who is under the care of a physician;
(10) "Physician", a doctor of medicine or osteopathy licensed to practice
medicine in this state;
(11) "Qualified patient", a competent adult who is a resident of this state and
who has satisfied the requirements of sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 in order to obtain a
prescription for medication that the qualified patient may self-administer to end the
qualified patient's life in a humane and dignified manner;
(12) "Self-administer", for a qualified patient, to voluntarily and consciously
perform the physical act of ingesting or otherwise administering to himself or herself the
medication to end the qualified patient's own life;

HB 2188 3
(13) "Terminal disease", an incurable and irreversible disease that has been
medically confirmed and will, within reasonable medical judgment, produce death
within six months.
191.2410. A patient has a right to information regarding all treatment options
reasonably available for the care of the patient, including, but not limited to,
information in response to specific questions about the foreseeable risks and benefits of
medication, without a physician withholding requested information regardless of the
purpose of the questions or the nature of the information.
191.2415. An adult who is competent, is a resident of this state, has been
determined by an attending physician and a consulting physician to be suffering from a
terminal disease, and has voluntarily expressed the wish to die may make a written
request for medication that the adult may self-administer in accordance with sections
191.2400 to 191.2520. An adult does not qualify under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520
solely because of age or disability.
191.2420. 1. A valid request for medication under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520
shall be substantially in the form described in section 191.2515, signed and dated by the
patient, and witnessed by at least two individuals who, in the presence of the patient,
attest that to the best of their knowledge and belief the patient is competent, is acting
voluntarily, and is not being coerced to sign the request.
2. (1) The language of a written request for medication under sections 191.2400
to 191.2520 shall be the language in which any conversations or consultations or
interpreted conversations or consultations between a patient and the patient's attending
physician or consulting physician are held.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the language of a written
request for medication under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 may be English when the
conversations or consultations or interpreted conversations or consultations between a
patient and the patient's attending physician or consulting physician were conducted in
a language other than English if the form described in section 191.2515 contains the
attachment described in section 191.2520.
3. At least one of the two or more witnesses required under this section and any
interpreter required under this section shall be a person who is not:
(1) A relative of the patient by blood, marriage, or adoption;
(2) A person who at the time the request is signed would be entitled to any
portion of the estate of the qualified patient upon death, under any will, trust, transfer
on death election, beneficiary designation, or otherwise by operation of any law; or
(3) An owner, operator, or employee of a health care facility where the qualified
patient is receiving medical treatment or is a resident.

HB 2188 4
4. The patient's attending physician at the time the written request is signed
shall not be a witness.
5. If the patient is a patient in a long-term care facility at the time the patient
makes the written request, one of the witnesses shall be an individual designated by the
facility who has the qualifications specified by the department of health and senior
services by rule.
191.2425. The attending physician shall:
(1) Make the initial determination of whether a patient has a terminal disease, is
competent, and has made the written request under section 191.2415 voluntarily;
(2) Request that the patient demonstrate state residency as required by section
191.2470;
(3) To ensure that the patient is making an informed decision, inform the patient
of:
(a) The patient's medical diagnosis;
(b) The patient's prognosis;
(c) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to be prescribed;
(d) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; and
(e) The feasible alternatives to taking the medication to be prescribed, including
palliative care and comfort care, hospice care, pain control, and disease-directed
treatment options;
(4) Refer the patient to a consulting physician for medical confirmation of the
diagnosis and for a determination that the patient is competent and acting voluntarily;
(5) Confirm that the patient's request does not arise from coercion or undue
influence by another individual by discussing with the patient, outside the presence of
any other individual, except for an interpreter, whether the patient is feeling coerced or
unduly influenced;
(6) Refer the patient for counseling, if appropriate, as described in section
191.2435;
(7) Recommend that the patient notify the patient's next of kin;
(8) Counsel the patient about the importance of having another person present
when the patient takes the medication prescribed under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520
and counsel the patient about not taking the medication prescribed under sections
191.2400 to 191.2520 in a public place;
(9) Inform the patient that the patient has an opportunity to rescind the request
at any time and in any manner and offer the patient an opportunity to rescind the
request at the end of the fifteen-day waiting period in accordance with section 191.2450;

HB 2188 5
(10) Verify, immediately before writing the prescription for medication under
sections 191.2400 to 191.2520, that the patient is making an informed decision;
(11) Fulfill the medical record documentation requirements of section 191.2465;
(12) Ensure that all appropriate steps are carried out in accordance with sections
191.2400 to 191.2520 before writing a prescription for medication to enable a qualified
patient to end the qualified patient's life in a humane and dignified manner; and
(13) Dispense medications directly, including ancillary medications intended to
minimize the patient's discomfort, if the attending physician is authorized under state
law or rule to dispense medications and has a current Drug Enforcement
Administration certificate or, with the patient's written consent:
(a) Contact a pharmacist and inform the pharmacist of the prescription; and
(b) Deliver the written prescription personally, by mail, or electronically to the
pharmacist, who may dispense the medications in person to the patient, the attending
physician, or an expressly identified agent of the patient.
191.2430. Before a patient is determined to be a qualified patient under sections
191.2400 to 191.2520, a consulting physician shall examine the patient and the patient's
relevant medical records and confirm, in writing, the attending physician's diagnosis
that the patient is suffering from a terminal disease and verify that the patient is
competent, is acting voluntarily, and has made an informed decision.
191.2435. If, in the opinion of the attending physician or the consulting
physician, a patient may be suffering from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or
depression causing impaired judgment, the physician shall refer the patient for
counseling. Medication for the patient to self-administer to end the patient's own life in
a humane and dignified manner shall not be prescribed until the person performing the
counseling determines that the patient is not suffering from a psychiatric or
psychological disorder or depression that so impairs judgment as to prevent the
patient's informed decision.
191.2440. A qualified patient shall not receive a prescription for medication
under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 unless the qualified patient has made an informed
decision. Immediately before writing a prescription for medication under sections
191.2400 to 191.2520, the attending physician shall verify that the qualified patient is
making an informed decision.
191.2445. A patient who declines or is unable to notify the patient's next of kin
shall not have the patient's request for medication denied for that reason.
191.2450. To receive a prescription for medication that the qualified patient may
self-administer under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520, a qualified patient shall make an
oral request and a written request and reiterate the oral request to the qualified

HB 2188 6
patient's attending physician at least fifteen days after making the initial oral request.
At the time the qualified patient makes the qualified patient's second oral request, the
attending physician shall offer the qualified patient an opportunity to rescind the
request.
191.2455. A patient may rescind the patient's request at any time and in any
manner without regard to the patient's mental state. A prescription for medication shall
not be written under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 without the attending physician
offering the qualified patient an opportunity to rescind the request.
191.2460. At least fifteen days are required to elapse between the patient's initial
oral request and the date the patient signs the written request under section 191.2450.
At least forty-eight hours are required to elapse between the date the patient signs the
written request and the writing of a prescription under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520.
191.2465. The following shall be documented or filed in a patient's medical
record:
(1) All oral requests by the patient for medication to end that patient's life in a
humane and dignified manner;
(2) All written requests by the patient for medication to end that patient's life in
a humane and dignified manner;
(3) The attending physician's diagnosis and prognosis and the attending
physician's determination that the patient is competent, is acting voluntarily, and has
made an informed decision;
(4) The consulting physician's diagnosis and prognosis and the consulting
physician's verification that the patient is competent, is acting voluntarily, and has made
an informed decision;
(5) A report of the outcome and determinations made during counseling, if
counseling is provided as described in section 191.2435;
(6) The attending physician's offer to the patient to rescind the patient's request
at the time of the patient's second oral request under section 191.2450; and
(7) A note by the attending physician indicating that all requirements under
sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 have been met, including the requirements of section
191.2425, and indicating the steps taken to carry out the patient's request, including a
notation of the medication prescribed.
191.2470. For purposes of sections 191.2400 to 191.2520, only requests made by
residents of this state shall be granted. The residence of a person is that place where the
person has established a fixed and principal home to which the person, whenever
temporarily absent, intends to return. The following factors may be offered in

HB 2188 7
determining a person's residence under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 and need not all
be present in order to determine a person's residence:
(1) Possession of a valid driver's license issued by the department of revenue;
(2) Registration to vote in this state;
(3) Evidence that the person owns or leases property in this state;
(4) The location of any dwelling currently occupied by the person;
(5) The place where any motor vehicle owned by the person is registered;
(6) The residence address, not a post office box, shown on a current income tax
return;
(7) The residence address, not a post office box, at which the person's mail is
received;
(8) The residence address, not a post office box, shown on any current resident
hunting or fishing licenses held by the person;
(9) The residence address, not a post office box, shown on any driver's license
held by the person;
(10) The receipt of any public benefit conditioned upon residency, defined
substantially as provided in this section; or
(11) Any other objective facts tending to indicate a person's place of residence.
191.2475. A person who has custody of or control over any unused medications
prescribed in accordance with sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 after the death of the
qualified patient shall personally deliver the unused medications to the nearest facility
qualified to dispose of controlled substances or, if such delivery is impracticable,
personally dispose of the unused medications by any lawful means, in accordance with
any guidelines adopted by the department of health and senior services.
191.2480. 1. The department of health and senior services shall annually review
all records maintained under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520.
2. (1) The department of health and senior services shall require any health care
provider upon writing a prescription or dispensing medication under sections 191.2400
to 191.2520 to file a copy of the prescription or dispensing record, and other
documentation required under section 191.2465 associated with writing the prescription
or dispensing the medication, with the department.
(2) Documentation required to be filed under this subsection shall be mailed or
otherwise transmitted as allowed by rules of the department no later than thirty
calendar days after the writing of the prescription or the dispensing of medication under
sections 191.2400 to 191.2520, except that all documents required to be filed with the
department by the prescribing physician after the death of the qualified patient shall be

HB 2188 8
submitted no later than thirty calendar days after the date of the death of the qualified
patient.
(3) In the event that a person required under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 to
report information to the department provides an inadequate or incomplete report, the
department shall contact the person to request an adequate or complete report.
3. The department of health and senior services shall promulgate rules to
facilitate the collection of information regarding compliance with sections 191.2400 to
191.2520. Except as otherwise provided by law, the information collected is confidential,
is not a public record, and shall not be made available for inspection by the public.
4. The department of health and senior services shall generate and make
available to the public an annual statistical report of information collected under this
section and submit a copy of the report to the standing committees of the house of
representatives and the senate having jurisdiction over health matters annually by
March first.
5. In addition to the rules required to be promulgated under this section, the
department of health and senior services shall promulgate all necessary rules for the
administration of sections 191.2400 to 191.2520. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
191.2485. Any provision in a contract, will, or other agreement, whether written
or oral, to the extent the provision would affect whether a person may make or rescind a
request for medication to end the person's life in a humane and dignified manner, is not
valid. Any obligation owing under any currently existing contract shall not be
conditioned upon or affected by the making or rescinding of a request by a person for
medication to end the person's life in a humane and dignified manner.
191.2490. The sale, procurement, or issuance of any life, health, or accident
insurance or annuity policy or the rate charged for any life, health, or accident
insurance or annuity policy shall not be conditioned upon or affected by the making or
rescinding of a request by a qualified patient for medication that the patient may self-
administer to end the patient's life in accordance with sections 191.2400 to 191.2520. A
qualified patient whose life is insured under a life insurance policy issued by insurers
organized under chapter 376 and the beneficiaries of the policy shall not be denied

HB 2188 9
benefits on the basis of self-administration of medication by the qualified patient in
accordance with sections 191.2400 to 191.2520. The rating, sale, procurement, or
issuance of any medical professional liability insurance policy delivered or issued for
delivery in this state shall be in accordance with the insurance laws of this state.
191.2495. Sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 do not authorize a physician or any
other person to end a patient's life by lethal injection, mercy killing, or active
euthanasia. Actions taken in accordance with sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 do not, for
any purpose, constitute suicide, assisted suicide, mercy killing, or homicide under the
law. State reports shall not refer to acts committed under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520
as "suicide" or "assisted suicide". Consistent with the provisions of sections 191.2400 to
191.2520, state reports shall refer to acts committed under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520
as obtaining and self-administering life-ending medication. Nothing contained in
sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 shall be interpreted to lower the applicable standard of
care for the attending physician, the consulting physician, a psychiatrist, a psychologist,
or other health care provider providing services under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520.
191.2496. 1. As used in this section, the term "covered individual" means a
health care provider, physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, clinical social worker,
professional counselor, pharmacist, pharmacist's assistant, patient, witness, or family
member or friend of a patient.
2. Any covered individual who is present during, has knowledge of, performs, or
engages in any of the activities described in sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 shall not, on
account of such activities, be subject to any civil or criminal liability, professional
discipline, or other penalty of any nature so long as such covered individual is acting in
good faith and is not guilty of willful misconduct or gross negligence.
191.2500. Nothing in sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 requires a health care
provider to provide medication to a qualified patient to end the qualified patient's life.
If a health care provider is unable or unwilling to carry out the qualified patient's
request under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520, the health care provider shall transfer any
relevant medical records for the patient to a new health care provider upon request by
the patient.
191.2505. 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Notice", a separate statement in writing advising of the prohibiting health
care provider's policy with respect to participating in activities under sections 191.2400
to 191.2520;

HB 2188 10
(2) "Participating, or entering into an agreement to participate, in activities
under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520", doing or entering into an agreement to do any one
or more of the following:
(a) Performing the duties of an attending physician as specified in sections
191.2400 to 191.2520;
(b) Performing the duties of a consulting physician as specified in sections
191.2400 to 191.2520;
(c) Performing the duties of a state-licensed psychiatrist, state-licensed
psychologist, state-licensed clinical social worker, or state-licensed clinical professional
counselor, in the circumstance that a referral to one is made under section 191.2435;
(d) Delivering the prescription for, dispensing, or delivering the dispensed
medication in accordance with sections 191.2400 to 191.2520; or
(e) Being present when the qualified patient takes the medication prescribed in
accordance with sections 191.2400 to 191.2520.

"Participating, or entering into an agreement to participate, in activities under sections
191.2400 to 191.2520" does not include doing, or entering into an agreement to do, any
of the following: diagnosing whether a patient has a terminal disease; informing the
patient of the medical prognosis or determining whether a patient has the capacity to
make decisions; providing information to a patient about sections 191.2400 to 191.2520;
or providing a patient, upon the patient's request, with a referral to another health care
provider for the purposes of participating in the activities authorized by sections
191.2400 to 191.2520.
2. The provisions of this section govern the basis for prohibiting persons or
entities from participating in activities under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520, notification,
penalties, and permissible actions.
3. Subject to compliance with subsection 4 of this section and notwithstanding
any other law, a health care provider may prohibit its employees, independent
contractors, or other persons or entities, including other health care providers, from
participating in activities under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 while on premises owned
or under the management or direct control of that prohibiting health care provider or
while acting within the course and scope of any employment by, or contract with, the
prohibiting health care provider.
4. A health care provider that elects to prohibit its employees, independent
contractors, or other persons or entities, including other health care providers, from
participating in activities under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520, as described in subsection
3 of this section, shall first give notice of the policy prohibiting participation under

HB 2188 11
sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 to those employees, independent contractors, or other
persons or entities, including other health care providers. A health care provider that
fails to provide notice to those employees, independent contractors, or other persons or
entities, including other health care providers, in compliance with this subsection shall
not enforce such a policy against those employees, independent contractors, or other
persons or entities, including other health care providers.
5. Subject to compliance with subsection 4 of this section, the prohibiting health
care provider may take action, including, but not limited to, the following, as applicable,
against an employee, independent contractor, or other person or entity, including
another health care provider, that violates the health care provider's policy prohibiting
participation in activities under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520:
(1) Loss of privileges, loss of membership, or other action authorized by the
bylaws or rules and regulations of the medical staff;
(2) Suspension, loss of employment, or other action authorized by the policies
and practices of the prohibiting health care provider;
(3) Termination of any lease or other contract between the prohibiting health
care provider and the employee, independent contractor, or other person or entity,
including another health care provider, that violates the policy; or
(4) Imposition of any other nonmonetary remedy provided for in any lease or
contract between the prohibiting health care provider and the employee, independent
contractor, or other person or entity, including another health care provider, in violation
of the policy.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent, or to allow a prohibiting
health care provider to prohibit, an employee, independent contractor, or other person
or entity, including another health care provider, from any of the following:
(1) Participating, or entering into an agreement to participate, in activities under
sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 while on premises that are not owned or under the
management or direct control of the prohibiting health care provider or while acting
outside the course and scope of the participant's duties as an employee of, or an
independent contractor for, the prohibiting health care provider; or
(2) Participating, or entering into an agreement to participate, in activities under
sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 as an attending physician or consulting physician while on
premises that are not owned or under the management or direct control of the
prohibiting health care provider.
7. In taking actions under subsection 5 of this section, a health care provider
shall comply with all procedures required by law, its own policies or procedures, and

HB 2188 12
any contract with the employee, independent contractor, or other person or entity,
including another health care provider, in violation of the policy, as applicable.
8. Any action taken by a prohibiting health care provider under this section is
not reportable to the appropriate licensing board including, but not limited to, the state
board of registration for the healing arts and the state board of pharmacy. The fact that
a health care provider participates in activities under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 shall
not be the sole basis for a complaint or report by another health care provider to the
appropriate licensing board including, but not limited to, the state board of registration
for the healing arts and the state board of pharmacy.
191.2510. Any governmental entity that incurs costs resulting from a person
ending the person's life under sections 191.2400 to 191.2520 in a public place has a claim
against the estate of the person to recover the costs and reasonable attorney's fees
related to enforcing the claim.
191.2515. A request for medication as authorized by sections 191.2400 to
191.2520 shall be in substantially the following form:
REQUEST FOR MEDICATION TO END MY LIFE IN A
HUMANE AND DIGNIFIED MANNER
I, ______ , am an adult of sound mind. I am suffering from _____
_ , which my attending physician has determined is a terminal
disease and which has been medically confirmed by a consulting
physician.
I have been fully informed of my diagnosis and prognosis, the
nature of medication to be prescribed and potential associated
risks, the expected result, and feasible alternatives, including
palliative care and comfort care, hospice care, pain control, and
disease-directed treatment options.
I request that my attending physician prescribe medication that I
may self-administer to end my life in a humane and dignified
manner and contact any pharmacist to fill the prescription.
INITIAL ONE:
______ I have informed my family of my decision and taken their
opinions into consideration.
______ I have decided not to inform my family of my decision.

HB 2188 13
______ I have no family to inform of my decision.
I understand that I have the right to rescind this request at any
time.
I understand the full import of this request, and I expect to die
when I take the medication to be prescribed. I further
understand that, although most deaths occur within three hours,
my death may take longer, and my physician has counseled me
about this possibility.
I make this request voluntarily and without reservation, and I
accept full moral responsibility for my actions.
Signed: __________________
Dated: __________________
DECLARATION OF WITNESSES
By initialing and signing below on or after the date the person
named above signs, we declare that the person making and
signing the above request:
Initials of Witness 1:
______ 1. Is personally known to us or has provided proof of
identity;
______ 2. Signed this request in our presence on the date of the
person's signature;
______ 3. Appears to be of sound mind and not under duress,
fraud, or undue influence; and
______ 4. Is not a patient for whom either of us is the attending
physician.
Printed Name of Witness 1: __________________
Signature of Witness 1/Date: __________________

HB 2188 14
Initials of Witness 2:
______ 1. Is personally known to us or has provided proof of
identity;
______ 2. Signed this request in our presence on the date of the
person's signature;
______ 3. Appears to be of sound mind and not under duress,
fraud, or undue influence; and
______ 4. Is not a patient for whom either of us is the attending
physician.
Printed Name of Witness 2: __________________
Signature of Witness 2/Date: __________________
NOTE: One witness must be a person who is not a relative by
blood, marriage, or adoption of the person signing this request, is
not entitled to any portion of the person's estate upon death, and
does not own or operate or is not employed at a health care
facility where the person is a patient or resident. The person's
attending physician at the time the request is signed may not be a
witness. If the person is an inpatient at a long-term care facility,
one of the witnesses must be an individual designated by the
facility.
191.2520. The form of an attachment for purposes of providing interpretive
services as described in subsection 2 of section 191.2420 shall be in substantially the
following form:
I, ______ , am fluent in English and (language of patient).
On (date) at approximately (time) I read the "REQUEST FOR
MEDICATION TO END MY LIFE IN A HUMANE AND
DIGNIFIED MANNER" to (name of patient) in (language of
patient).
Mr./Ms. (name of patient) affirmed to me that he/she understands
the content of this form, that he/she desires to sign this form

HB 2188 15
under his/her own power and volition and that he/she requested
to sign the form after consultations with an attending physician
and a consulting physician.
Under penalty of perjury, I declare that I am fluent in English
and (language of patient) and that the contents of this form, to the
best of my knowledge, are true and correct.
Executed at (name of city, county, and state) on (date).
Interpreter's signature: __________________
Interpreter's printed name: __________________
Interpreter's address: __________________
565.017. It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecutions under sections
565.020, 565.021, and 565.023 that the person's conduct was expressly authorized by
sections 191.2400 to 191.2520.
✔